Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2997
Direct action by member.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a member may maintain a direct action against the limited cooperative association, an officer, or a director to enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the member, including rights and interests under the articles of organization or bylaws.

(2) A member maintaining a direct action under this section is required to plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 97.